Illinois, session 104th, SB1914.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Condominium Property Act is amended by 5changing Section 9 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 605/9)  (from Ch. 30, par. 309)7    Sec. 9. Sharing of expenses - Lien for nonpayment. 8    (a) All common expenses incurred or accrued prior to the 9first conveyance of a unit shall be paid by the developer, and 10during this period no common expense assessment shall be 11payable to the association. It shall be the duty of each unit 12owner including the developer to pay his proportionate share 13of the common expenses commencing with the first conveyance. 14The proportionate share shall be in the same ratio as his 15percentage of ownership in the common elements set forth in 16the declaration.17    (b) The condominium instruments may provide that common 18expenses for insurance premiums be assessed on a basis 19reflecting increased charges for coverage on certain units.20    (c) Budget and reserves.21        (1) The board of managers shall prepare and distribute 22    to all unit owners a detailed proposed annual budget, 23    setting forth with particularity all anticipated common   SB1914- 2 -LRB104 09871 JRC 19939 b1    expenses by category as well as all anticipated 2    assessments and other income. The initial budget and 3    common expense assessment based thereon shall be adopted 4    prior to the conveyance of any unit. The budget shall also 5    set forth each unit owner's proposed common expense 6    assessment.7        (2) All budgets adopted by a board of managers on or 8    after July 1, 1990 shall provide for reasonable reserves 9    for capital expenditures and deferred maintenance for 10    repair or replacement of the common elements. In the case 11    of negligence on the part of the board resulting in the 12    loss of use of a unit by the unit owner, a portion of the 13    reserves shall also be designated for use to assist the 14    unit owner in covering expenses incurred as a result of 15    the loss of use if the unit owner does not carry Category D 16    loss-of-use insurance. To determine the amount of reserves 17    appropriate for an association, the board of managers 18    shall take into consideration the following: (i) the 19    repair and replacement cost, and the estimated useful 20    life, of the property which the association is obligated 21    to maintain, including but not limited to structural and 22    mechanical components, surfaces of the buildings and 23    common elements, and energy systems and equipment; (ii) 24    the current and anticipated return on investment of 25    association funds; (iii) any independent professional 26    reserve study which the association may obtain; (iv) the   SB1914- 3 -LRB104 09871 JRC 19939 b1    financial impact on unit owners, and the market value of 2    the condominium units, of any assessment increase needed 3    to fund reserves; and (v) the ability of the association 4    to obtain financing or refinancing.5        (3) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection 6    (c), an association without a reserve requirement in its 7    condominium instruments may elect to waive in whole or in 8    part the reserve requirements of this Section by a vote of 9    2/3 of the total votes of the association. Any association 10    having elected under this paragraph (3) to waive the 11    provisions of subsection (c) may by a vote of 2/3 of the 12    total votes of the association elect to again be governed 13    by the requirements of subsection (c).14        (4) In the event that an association elects to waive 15    all or part of the reserve requirements of this Section, 16    that fact must be disclosed after the meeting at which the 17    waiver occurs by the association in the financial 18    statements of the association and, highlighted in bold 19    print, in the response to any request of a prospective 20    purchaser for the information prescribed under Section 21    22.1; and no member of the board of managers or the 22    managing agent of the association shall be liable, and no 23    cause of action may be brought for damages against these 24    parties, for the lack or inadequacy of reserve funds in 25    the association budget.26        (5) At the end of an association's fiscal year and   SB1914- 4 -LRB104 09871 JRC 19939 b1    after the association has approved any end-of-year fiscal 2    audit, if applicable, if the fiscal year ended with a 3    surplus of funds over actual expenses, including budgeted 4    reserve fund contributions, then, to the extent that there 5    are not any contrary provisions in the association's 6    declaration and bylaws, the board of managers has the 7    authority, in its discretion, to dispose of the surplus in 8    one or more of the following ways: (i) contribute the 9    surplus to the association's reserve fund; (ii) return the 10    surplus to the unit owners as a credit against the 11    remaining monthly assessments for the current fiscal year; 12    (iii) return the surplus to the unit owners in the form of 13    a direct payment to the unit owners; or (iv) maintain the 14    funds in the operating account, in which case the funds 15    shall be applied as a credit when calculating the 16    following year's annual budget. If the fiscal year ends in 17    a deficit, then, to the extent that there are not any 18    contrary provisions in the association's declaration and 19    bylaws, the board of managers has the authority, in its 20    discretion, to address the deficit by incorporating it 21    into the following year's annual budget. If 20% of the 22    unit owners of the association deliver a petition 23    objecting to the action under this paragraph (5) within 30 24    days after notice to the unit owners of the action, the 25    board of managers shall call a meeting of the unit owners 26    within 30 days of the date of delivery of the petition. At   SB1914- 5 -LRB104 09871 JRC 19939 b1    the meeting, the unit owners may vote to select a 2    different option than the option selected by the board of 3    managers. Unless a majority of the total votes of the unit 4    owners are cast at the meeting to reject the board's 5    selection and select a different option, the board's 6    decision is ratified. 7    (d) (Blank).8    (e) The condominium instruments may provide for the 9assessment, in connection with expenditures for the limited 10common elements, of only those units to which the limited 11common elements are assigned.12    (f) Payment of any assessment shall be in amounts and at 13times determined by the board of managers.14    (g) Lien.15        (1) If any unit owner shall fail or refuse to make any 16    payment of the common expenses or the amount of any unpaid 17    fine when due, the amount thereof together with any 18    interest, late charges, reasonable attorney fees incurred 19    enforcing the covenants of the condominium instruments, 20    rules and regulations of the board of managers, or any 21    applicable statute or ordinance, and costs of collections 22    shall constitute a lien on the interest of the unit owner 23    in the property prior to all other liens and encumbrances, 24    recorded or unrecorded, except only (a) taxes, special 25    assessments and special taxes theretofore or thereafter 26    levied by any political subdivision or municipal   SB1914- 6 -LRB104 09871 JRC 19939 b1    corporation of this State and other State or federal taxes 2    which by law are a lien on the interest of the unit owner 3    prior to preexisting recorded encumbrances thereon and (b) 4    encumbrances on the interest of the unit owner recorded 5    prior to the date of such failure or refusal which by law 6    would be a lien thereon prior to subsequently recorded 7    encumbrances. Any action brought to extinguish the lien of 8    the association shall include the association as a party.9        (2) With respect to encumbrances executed prior to 10    August 30, 1984 or encumbrances executed subsequent to 11    August 30, 1984 which are neither bonafide first mortgages 12    nor trust deeds and which encumbrances contain a statement 13    of a mailing address in the State of Illinois where notice 14    may be mailed to the encumbrancer thereunder, if and 15    whenever and as often as the manager or board of managers 16    shall send, by United States certified or registered mail, 17    return receipt requested, to any such encumbrancer at the 18    mailing address set forth in the recorded encumbrance a 19    statement of the amounts and due dates of the unpaid 20    common expenses with respect to the encumbered unit, then, 21    unless otherwise provided in the declaration or bylaws, 22    the prior recorded encumbrance shall be subject to the 23    lien of all unpaid common expenses with respect to the 24    unit which become due and payable within a period of 90 25    days after the date of mailing of each such notice.26        (3) The purchaser of a condominium unit at a judicial   SB1914- 7 -LRB104 09871 JRC 19939 b1    foreclosure sale, or a mortgagee who receives title to a 2    unit by deed in lieu of foreclosure or judgment by common 3    law strict foreclosure or otherwise takes possession 4    pursuant to court order under the Illinois Mortgage 5    Foreclosure Law, shall have the duty to pay the unit's 6    proportionate share of the common expenses for the unit 7    assessed from and after the first day of the month after 8    the date of the judicial foreclosure sale, delivery of the 9    deed in lieu of foreclosure, entry of a judgment in common 10    law strict foreclosure, or taking of possession pursuant 11    to such court order. Such payment confirms the 12    extinguishment of any lien created pursuant to paragraph 13    (1) or (2) of this subsection (g) by virtue of the failure 14    or refusal of a prior unit owner to make payment of common 15    expenses, where the judicial foreclosure sale has been 16    confirmed by order of the court, a deed in lieu thereof has 17    been accepted by the lender, or a consent judgment has 18    been entered by the court.19        (4) The purchaser of a condominium unit at a judicial 20    foreclosure sale, other than a mortgagee, who takes 21    possession of a condominium unit pursuant to a court order 22    or a purchaser who acquires title from a mortgagee shall 23    have the duty to pay the proportionate share, if any, of 24    the common expenses for the unit which would have become 25    due in the absence of any assessment acceleration during 26    the 6 months immediately preceding institution of an   SB1914- 8 -LRB104 09871 JRC 19939 b1    action to enforce the collection of assessments, and which 2    remain unpaid by the owner during whose possession the 3    assessments accrued. If the outstanding assessments are 4    paid at any time during any action to enforce the 5    collection of assessments, the purchaser shall have no 6    obligation to pay any assessments which accrued before he 7    or she acquired title. 8        (5) The notice of sale of a condominium unit under 9    subsection (c) of Section 15-1507 of the Code of Civil 10    Procedure shall state that the purchaser of the unit other 11    than a mortgagee shall pay the assessments and the legal 12    fees required by subdivisions (g)(1) and (g)(4) of Section 13    9 of this Act. The statement of assessment account issued 14    by the association to a unit owner under subsection (i) of 15    Section 18 of this Act, and the disclosure statement 16    issued to a prospective purchaser under Section 22.1 of 17    this Act, shall state the amount of the assessments and 18    the legal fees, if any, required by subdivisions (g)(1) 19    and (g)(4) of Section 9 of this Act. 20    (h) A lien for common expenses shall be in favor of the 21members of the board of managers and their successors in 22office and shall be for the benefit of all other unit owners. 23Notice of the lien may be recorded by the board of managers, or 24if the developer is the manager or has a majority of seats on 25the board of managers and the manager or board of managers 26fails to do so, any unit owner may record notice of the lien.   SB1914- 9 -LRB104 09871 JRC 19939 b1Upon the recording of such notice the lien may be foreclosed by 2an action brought in the name of the board of managers in the 3same manner as a mortgage of real property.4    (i) Unless otherwise provided in the declaration, the 5members of the board of managers and their successors in 6office, acting on behalf of the other unit owners, shall have 7the power to bid on the interest so foreclosed at the 8foreclosure sale, and to acquire and hold, lease, mortgage and 9convey it.10    (j) Any encumbrancer may from time to time request in 11writing a written statement from the manager or board of 12managers setting forth the unpaid common expenses with respect 13to the unit covered by his encumbrance. Unless the request is 14complied with within 20 days, all unpaid common expenses which 15become due prior to the date of the making of such request 16shall be subordinate to the lien of the encumbrance. Any 17encumbrancer holding a lien on a unit may pay any unpaid common 18expenses payable with respect to the unit, and upon payment 19the encumbrancer shall have a lien on the unit for the amounts 20paid at the same rank as the lien of his encumbrance.21    (k) Nothing in Public Act 83-1271 is intended to change 22the lien priorities of any encumbrance created prior to August 2330, 1984.24(Source: P.A. 100-292, eff. 1-1-18.)